Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,211.01
Person under twenty-one years of age; prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person under twenty-one years of age to operate or be in the actual physical control of any motor vehicle:

(1) When such person has a concentration of two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of his or her blood but less than the concentration prescribed under subdivision (1)(b) of section 60-6,196; or

(2) When such person has a concentration of two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of his or her breath but less than the concentration prescribed under subdivision (1)(c) of section 60-6,196.

Laws 1993, LB 564, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 19.